Rhode Island statutes. Title 47 Weights and Measures
Chapter 15 Containers

47-15-1.
Purpose.

This chapter is designed to protect purchasers of any commodity within its provisions against deception or misrepresentation as to the quantity or amount of the commodity purchased, and, as against the seller, shall be strictly construed with a view to effect its object.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 165, § 1.

47-15-2.
Applicability.

Except as provided in the following section, the provisions of this chapter apply to any commodity when sold, offered, or exposed for sale in containers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 165, § 1.

47-15-3.
Exemptions.

The provisions of this chapter do not apply:

To a sale of a commodity when the sale is made from bulk and the quantity is weighed, measured, or counted for the immediate purpose of the sale;

To the sale of a commodity in any container of a net weight of one-half ounce (1/2 oz.) or less avoirdupois, or of a net measure of one-half (1/2) fluid ounce or less, or when the net count, other than by linear measure, is less than six (6), and the contents are readily visible;

To a sale of medicine when prescribed by a licensed physician, veterinarian, or dentist, or to a sale of medicinal or pharmaceutical preparations of mixtures of two (2) or more medicinal substances.

This subdivision shall not be construed as exempting products from the requirements of accuracy in statements of total physical weight, counts, and measures.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 165, § 1.

47-15-4.
“Container” defined.

“Container”
as used in this chapter means any receptacle or carton, whether lidded or unlidded, into which a commodity is packed or placed, or any wrappings with or into which any commodity is wrapped or put for sale.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

47-15-4

; P.L. 1966, ch. 165, § 1.

47-15-5.
“Lidded container” and “closed container” defined.

As used in this chapter,
“lidded container”
and

“closed container”

are synonymous and, unless otherwise specifically defined in this chapter, mean any container of which forty percent (40%) or more of the opening is covered by any material in the form of a lid, cover, or wrapping of any kind.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 165, § 1.

47-15-6.
False construction.

No container wherein commodities are packed shall have a false bottom, false side walls, false lid or covering, or be otherwise so constructed or filled, wholly or partially, as to facilitate the perpetration of deception or fraud.

Any sealer may seize any container which facilitates the perpetration of deception or fraud, and the contents of the container. By order of the superior court of the county within which a violation of this section occurs, the containers seized shall be condemned and destroyed or released upon such conditions as the court may impose to insure against their use in violation of this chapter. The contents of any condemned container shall be returned to the owner thereof if the owner furnishes proper facilities for its return.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 165, § 1.

47-15-7.
Net quantity labels.

Whenever any commodities are sold in containers, the net quantity of the contents of the container shall be plainly and conspicuously marked, branded, or otherwise indicated on the principal display panel of the container or on a label or tag attached thereto; provided, that containers, circular in cross-sectional area, may contain the statement of net quantity on either the principal display panel or on an area immediately adjacent thereto, which area shall be equivalent to not less than twenty percent (20%) of the entire label, or on the top of the container if the cross-sectional area is not less than the cross-sectional area of the bottom of the container. The size of the markings shall be governed by the area of the display panel, or the area of the label or tag attached.

The state sealer shall establish necessary rules and regulations to carry out the design of this chapter.

The provisions of this section do not apply:

To containers while being used for the delivery of a food which, in accordance with the practice of the trade, is to be processed, labeled, packed, or repacked on premises other than where originally placed in those containers.

To transparent wrappings, devoid of any words, letters, or numerals, used as a means of protecting the commodity, when the weight or count of the contents, or any portion thereof, is accurately determined at the time of, and for the immediate purpose of, sale.

To an unlidded container when the weight of the contents, or any portion thereof, can be accurately determined at the time of, and for the immediate purpose of, sale, by the seller at the request of the buyer, on a weighing device installed for the purpose on the premises of the seller and sealed in accordance with the provisions of this division.

To an unlidded container when the count of the contents, or any portion thereof, is accurately determined at the time of, and for the immediate purpose of, sale.

To containers of fruits and vegetables, when the quantity is expressed in terms of count.

To containers of petroleum products where the net quantity of the contents of the containers is plainly and conspicuously marked, branded, or otherwise indicated on the side or top thereof.

When bottles containing beverages which conform to this chapter are placed in a carrying case of six (6) or more, the carrying case shall be exempt from the provisions of this chapter.

Whenever a commodity in a container is offered for sale, exposed for sale, or sold without a statement of net quantity appearing thereon as required by this section, the sealer shall, in writing, order the container and its contents off sale, and require that an accurate statement of net quantity be placed on the container before it may be released by the sealer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 165, § 1.

47-15-8.
Designation to be net — Non-rigid containers.

The designation of the quantity of the commodity shall be the net amount and shall be expressed in terms of weight, measure, or numerical count so that the quantity of the contents so marked shall be the net amount of the commodity in the package or container. Effective January 1, 1967, whenever the quantity is expressed in terms of measure or volume, the measure or volume declared on the label shall not be greater than the interior displacement of the container. Whenever the quantity of any commodity sold in a non-rigid container is expressed in terms of measure or volume, the measure or volume of the container for the commodity shall be determined in accordance with regulations established by the director. Whenever any commodity is sold in compressed form, the container of the commodity may carry a supplemental statement showing the measure or volume of the commodity in uncompressed form. Any letters, figures, or numerals used in the supplemental statement shall not be greater in size, or more conspicuously displayed, than the letters, figures, or numerals used in the required statement of quantity. The method of determining the measure or volume of the commodity in uncompressed form may be established by regulations of the director. No trademark, brand number, number, or numerals in combination or otherwise, shall be used on the side, top, or ends of the container which will facilitate deception or misrepresentation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 165, § 1.

47-15-9.
Solids and fluids — Trade custom.

The statement designating the quantity of the commodity shall be expressed in the terms of weight, measure, numerical count, or combination of numerical count and weight or measure, which are generally used by consumers to express quantity of the commodity and shall give accurate information as to the quantity thereof. If no general consumer usage exists which expresses accurate information as to the quantity of the commodity, the statement shall be in terms of liquid measure if the commodity is liquid, or in terms of weight if the commodity is solid. The quantity of viscous or semisolid commodities, or of a mixture of solids and liquids, may be stated in terms of weight or measure or both. When commodities are packed in brine or other nonedible preserving fluids, the weight or measure of the brine or nonedible fluid shall not be included in the weight or measure of the edible or other commodity indicated on the container. The content declaration for commodities packed in aerosol type containers shall be in terms of net weight.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 165, § 1.

47-15-10.
Statements of weight and measure.

A statement of weight shall be in terms of the avoirdupois pound and ounce. A statement of liquid measure shall be in terms of the United States gallon of 231 cubic inches, quart, pint, and fluid ounce, and, with the exception of liquid petroleum products, shall express the volume at 68 degrees Fahrenheit (20 degrees Centigrade), provided, that refrigerated commodities shall express the volume at the temperature at which the product is kept or offered for sale. A statement of dry measure shall be in terms of the United States bushel of 2,150.42 cubic inches, peck, dry quart, and dry pint. A statement of linear measure shall be in terms of the standard yard, foot, and inch. In lieu thereof, a statement of weight or measure may be in terms of the metric system. A statement of numerical count shall be expressed either in English words or Arabic numerals.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit expressing content statements in terms of the decimal system.

In addition to the quantity statements permitted by this section, liquid commodities may also be sold in containers marked one-half (1/2) gallon, one-half (1/2) pint, or one-quarter (1/4) pint. Fluid dairy products may be tested by a weights and measures official on the basis of weight as prescribed by regulations of the director.

In no case shall a declaration of quantity be qualified by the addition of the words, “when packed” or any words of similar import, nor shall any unit of weight, measure, or count be qualified by any term (such as jumbo, giant, full, or the like) that tends to exaggerate the amount of the commodity in the container.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 165, § 1.

47-15-11.
Largest unit statement of quantity.

If the quantity of the commodity in the container equals or exceeds the smallest unit of weight or measure which is specified in §

47-15-10

, the statement of quantity shall be expressed in the number of the largest of the units contained therein. Where the number is a whole number and a fraction, there may be substituted for the fraction its equivalent in smaller units. The stated number of any unit which is smaller than the largest unit specified in §

47-15-10

, shall not equal or exceed the number of those smaller units in the next larger unit so specified.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 165, § 1.

47-15-12.
Designation to be minimum without tolerance below.

The quantity of the contents may be stated in terms of minimum weight, minimum measure, or minimum count, but in those cases, the actual quantity shall in no instance exceed the stated minimum by more than ten percent (10%), and there shall be no tolerance below the stated minimum, except that the limitation on the actual quantity in excess of stated minimums shall not apply to peat moss, leaf mold, compost, animal manure, mulching materials, or similar materials or mixtures thereof, and for those materials the director may, by regulations, establish reasonable permissible maximums.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 165, § 1.

47-15-13.
Violations.

It is unlawful to pack, ship, or sell for resale at retail, any commodity in a container which does not conform to all the specifications of this chapter; or which is not conspicuously marked, branded, or otherwise labeled as required by this chapter; or on which any word, statement, or other information required by this chapter is not prominently placed, in such terms and with such conspicuousness, as compared with other words, statements, designs, or devices on the label or container, as to render it likely to be read and understood by ordinary persons under customary conditions of purchase and use.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 165, § 1.

47-15-14.
Federal laws and regulations.

The sale of any commodity packaged in a container, wherein both the container and the contents thereof comply with any act of congress or rules or regulations promulgated thereunder, appertaining to weight, measure, or count, does not violate the provisions of this chapter; nor does the sale of alcoholic beverages in containers complying with a rule, regulation, or an approval of the United States Treasury Department, Bureau of Internal Revenue, Alcohol Tax Unit, or of the state department of health, and pertaining to weight, measure, or count constitute a violation of the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 165, § 1.

47-15-15.
Permissible discrepancies.

When a commodity in a container is sold, and there is a discrepancy between the actual quantity of the commodities in the container and the net quantity of the contents thereof indicated on the container or between the fill of the commodity in the container and the capacity of the container, there is no violation of this chapter:

If the discrepancy is due to unavoidable leakage, shrinkage, evaporation, waste, or causes beyond the control of the seller acting in good faith.

If the seller purchased the commodity in the container, in good faith, relying upon the indication of the net contents thereof, and sold the commodity in the container without altering the contents thereof or the indication of the contents thereof, and the container had the name of a packer, manufacturer, wholesaler, or jobber thereon at the time the seller purchased it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 165, § 1.

47-15-16.
Penalty.

The violation of any provision of this chapter is a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or by imprisonment for not exceeding six (6) months, or by both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 165, § 1.